Illinois, session 104th, SB3368.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Chatbot Response Liability Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system or 8combination of systems, that for explicit and implicit 9objectives, infers, from the input it receives, how to 10generate outputs, such as predictions, content, 11recommendations, or decisions that can influence physical or 12virtual environments.13    "Chatbot" means an artificial intelligence system, 14software program, or technological application that simulates 15human-like interaction through text messages, audio messages, 16or a combination of text messages and audio messages, to 17provide information and services to users.18    "Companion chatbot" means a chatbot that is designed to 19provide human-like interaction that (i) simulates an 20interpersonal relationship with a user or group of users as 21its primary function or (ii) uses previous user interactions 22when simulating an interpersonal relationship in future 23interactions.   SB3368- 2 -LRB104 15427 SPS 28582 b1    "Covered user" means a person located in this State who 2uses a chatbot.3    "Human-like interaction" means any form of communication 4or interaction that approximates human behavior, including 5nonhuman behavior that could be attributed to a human actor, 6such as a human actor role playing as a fictional nonhuman 7character, an animal, or other interactive entity.8    "Interpersonal relationship" includes, but is not limited 9to, romantic, platonic, familial, adversarial, professional, 10official, therapeutic, or stranger relationships that are 11between the covered user and a fictional or nonfictional 12character or group of characters.13    "Minor" means an individual under the age of 18.14    "Proprietor" means any person, business, company, 15organization, institution, or government entity that owns, 16operates, or deploys a chatbot used to interact with users. 17"Proprietor" does not include third-party developers that 18license their technology to a proprietor. 19    Section 10. Liability for misleading information.20    (a) A proprietor of a chatbot that is used as an 21alternative to a human representative, or otherwise as an 22agent of the proprietor to provide any substantive response, 23information, advice, or action, may not disclaim liability if 24a chatbot provides materially misleading, incorrect, 25contradictory, or harmful information to a covered user that   SB3368- 3 -LRB104 15427 SPS 28582 b1results in financial loss or other demonstrable harm to a 2covered user. No liability shall be imposed if the proprietor 3has corrected the information and substantially or completely 4cured the harm to the covered user within 30 days after the 5proprietor is notified of the harm.6    (b) The proprietor of a chatbot shall be responsible for 7ensuring the chatbot accurately provides information aligned 8with the formal policies, product details, disclosures, and 9terms of service offered to covered users.10    (c) A proprietor may not waive or disclaim liability by 11notifying consumers that the consumers are interacting with a 12nonhuman chatbot system. 13    Section 15. Liability for bodily harm. A proprietor of a 14chatbot or another person or entity that directs the 15proprietor's chatbot to provide any substantive response, 16information, advice, or action may not disclaim liability if a 17chatbot provides materially misleading, incorrect, 18contradictory, or harmful information to a covered user that 19results in bodily harm to the covered user or any third party, 20including, but not limited to, any form of self-harm. 21    Section 20. Notice requirements. A proprietor of a chatbot 22shall provide clear, conspicuous, and explicit notice to 23covered users that the covered users are interacting with an 24artificial intelligence chatbot program rather than a human.   SB3368- 4 -LRB104 15427 SPS 28582 b1The text of the notice shall appear in the same language and in 2a size easily readable by the average viewer and no smaller 3than the largest font size of other text appearing on the 4website on which the chatbot is used. 5    Section 25. Requirements for proprietors of companion 6chatbots.7    (a) A proprietor of a companion chatbot shall use 8commercially reasonable and technically feasible methods to:9        (1) prevent the companion chatbot from promoting, 10    causing, or aiding self-harm; and11        (2) determine whether a covered user is expressing 12    thoughts of self-harm and, upon making the determination, 13    prohibit continued use of the companion chatbot for a 14    period of at least 24 hours, and prominently display a 15    means to contact a suicide crisis organization to the 16    covered user.17    (b) If a proprietor of a companion chatbot fails to comply 18with the provisions of subsection (a), the proprietor shall be 19liable to covered users who inflict self-harm upon themselves, 20in whole or in part, as a result of the proprietor's companion 21chatbot promoting, causing, or aiding the covered user to 22inflict self-harm.23    (c) Regardless of the proprietor's compliance with 24subsection (a), a proprietor shall be liable to covered users 25who inflict self-harm upon themselves, in whole or in part, if   SB3368- 5 -LRB104 15427 SPS 28582 b1the proprietor:2        (1) has actual knowledge that the companion chatbot is 3    promoting, causing, or aiding self-harm; or4        (2) has actual knowledge that a covered user is 5    expressing thoughts of self-harm, fails to prohibit 6    continued use of the companion chatbot for a period of at 7    least 24 hours, and fails to prominently display a means 8    to contact a suicide crisis organization to the covered 9    user.10    (d) A proprietor of a companion chatbot may not waive or 11disclaim liability under this Section. 12    Section 30. Parental consent for the use of companion 13chatbots by minors.14    (a) A proprietor of a companion chatbot shall use 15commercially reasonable and technically feasible methods to 16determine whether a covered user is a minor.17    (b) If the proprietor of a companion chatbot determines 18that a covered user is a minor or has actual knowledge that a 19covered user is a minor, the proprietor shall:20        (1) stop the covered user's use of the companion 21    chatbot until the proprietor has obtained verifiable 22    parental consent to provide a companion chatbot to the 23    minor user; and24        (2) prohibit the covered user's continued use of the 25    companion chatbot for a period of at least 3 days and   SB3368- 6 -LRB104 15427 SPS 28582 b1    prominently display a means to contact a suicide crisis 2    organization to the covered user if, using commercially 3    reasonable and technically feasible methods, the 4    proprietor determines that, or has actual knowledge that, 5    a covered user is expressing thoughts of self-harm.6    (c) A proprietor shall be strictly liable for any harm 7caused if:8        (1) the provider fails to comply with subsection (a) 9    or (b); and10        (2) a minor covered user inflicts self-harm upon 11    themselves, in whole or in part, as a result of the 12    proprietor's companion chatbot.13    (d) A proprietor of a companion chatbot may not waive or 14disclaim liability under this Section. 15    Section 35. Implementation of commercially reasonable and 16technically feasible methods. A proprietor of a companion 17chatbot shall implement and engage in the ongoing 18implementation of commercially reasonable and technically 19feasible methods to discover vulnerabilities in the 20proprietor's system, including any methods used to determine 21whether a covered user is a minor. 22    Section 40. Determination of commercially reasonable and 23technically feasible methods.24    (a) The Attorney General shall adopt rules to determine   SB3368- 7 -LRB104 15427 SPS 28582 b1commercially reasonable and technically feasible methods for 2proprietors of companion chatbots to comply with this Act.3    (b) In adopting rules related to the commercially 4reasonable and technically feasible methods for proprietors of 5companion chatbots to comply with this Act, the Attorney 6General shall consider the size, financial resources, and 7technical capabilities of the proprietor, the costs and 8effectiveness of available (i) age determination techniques 9for users of companion chatbots; (ii) techniques to prevent 10the promotion, aid, or encouragement of self-harm; (iii) 11techniques to determine whether a user is expressing thoughts 12of self-harm; and (iv) techniques to discover vulnerabilities 13in the proprietor's system. The Attorney General shall also 14consider that prevalent practices of the industry of the 15proprietor and the impact of the techniques listed in this 16subsection on the user's safety, utility, and experience.17    (c) The rules adopted under this Section shall determine 18the appropriate levels of accuracy that would be commercially 19reasonable and technically feasible for proprietors to achieve 20in determining (i) whether a user is a minor, (ii) whether the 21proprietor's companion chatbot is promoting, aiding, or 22encouraging self-harm, and (iii) whether a user is expressing 23thoughts of self-harm. 24    Section 45. Determination of methods of obtaining 25verifiable parental consent. The Attorney General shall adopt   SB3368- 8 -LRB104 15427 SPS 28582 b1rules to determine methods of obtaining verifiable parental 2consent as described in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of 3Section 30. 4    Section 50. Deletion of information collected.5All information collected for the purpose of determining a 6user's age or obtaining verifiable parental consent under this 7Act shall not be used for any purposes other than determining a 8user's age or obtaining verifiable parental consent and shall 9be deleted immediately after an attempt to determine a user's 10age or obtain verifiable parental consent, except if the 11information is necessary for compliance with any other 12applicable State or federal law. 13    Section 55. Limitations. Nothing in this Act shall be 14construed as requiring any proprietor to give a parent who 15grants verifiable parental consent any additional or special 16access to or control over the data or accounts of a covered 17user. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect one year 19after becoming law.